Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Mississippi Advisory Council on Faith-Based Initiatives

§ 7-1-601.
Mississippi Advisory Council on Faith-Based Initiatives created; legislative findings and intent; purpose; membership; council functions; report.

The Legislature finds that:

Compassionate groups of individuals have selflessly aided this state in serving our most vulnerable residents and our most debilitated neighborhoods.

Inspired by faith and civic commitment, these organizations have accomplished much in changing the lives of thousands and resurrecting neighborhoods torn by the strife of crime and poverty.

It is essential that this state cooperate with these organizations in order to provide an opportunity to participate on an equal basis, regardless of each organization’s orientation, whether faith-based or secular.

It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to recognize the contributions of these organizations and to encourage opportunities for faith-based and community-based organizations to work cooperatively with government entities in order to deliver services more effectively. The Legislature further intends that the purpose of the council is to advise the Governor and the Legislature on policies, priorities, and objectives to enlist, equip, enable, empower, and expand the work of faith-based, volunteer, and other community organizations to the full extent permitted by law.

There is established within the Office of the Governor the Mississippi Advisory Council on Faith-Based Initiatives.

The council shall be composed of not more than twenty-five (25) members. Council members may include, but need not be limited to, representatives from various faiths, faith-based organizations, community-based organizations, foundations, corporations, and municipalities.

The council shall be composed of the following members:

Seventeen (17) members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the Governor.

Four (4) members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the Lieutenant Governor.

Four (4) members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

Members of the council shall serve for terms of two (2) years, and may continue to serve after the expiration of their terms until a successor is appointed. Members shall be eligible for reappointment and serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority during their terms.

The Governor shall designate a member of the council to serve as chair for a term of two (2) years at the pleasure of the Governor. The chair may continue to serve after the expiration of the chair’s term and shall be eligible for redesignation by the Governor.

(i) The heads of executive departments and agencies shall, to the extent permitted by law, provide the council with information it needs for purposes of carrying out its mission.

The council may request and collect information, hold hearings, establish task forces consisting of members of the council or other individuals, as necessary to carry out its mission.

The council may conduct analyses and develop reports or other materials as necessary to perform its mission.

Members of the council shall serve without compensation.

The principal functions of the council are, to the extent permitted by law:

To develop and coordinate activities of faith-based and community-based programs and initiatives, enhance such efforts in communities, and seek such resources, legislation, and regulatory relief as may be necessary to accomplish these objectives;

To ensure that state policy decisions take into account the capacity of faith-based and other community-based initiatives to assist in the achievement of state priorities;

To identify and promote best practices and successful modes of delivering social services through faith-based and other community-based organizations;

To recommend changes in policies, programs, and practices that affect the delivery of services by such organizations and the needs of low-income and other underserved persons in Mississippi communities;

To coordinate public awareness of faith-based and community nonprofit initiatives, such as demonstration pilot programs or projects, public-private partnerships, volunteerism, and special projects;

To encourage private charitable giving to support faith-based and community-based initiatives;

To bring concerns, ideas, and policy options to the Governor and Legislature for assisting, strengthening, and replicating successful faith-based and other community-based programs;

To develop and implement strategic initiatives to strengthen the institutions of families and communities in this state;

To showcase and herald innovative grassroots nonprofit organizations and civic initiatives;

To eliminate unnecessary legislative, regulatory, and other bureaucratic barriers that impede effective faith-based and other community-based efforts to address social problems;

To monitor implementation of state policy affecting faith-based and other community-based organizations;

To ensure that the efforts of faith-based and other community-based organizations meet objective criteria for performance and accountability.

The council may not make any recommendation that conflicts with the Establishment Clause of the First Amendment to the United States Constitution or Section 18 of the Mississippi Constitution.

By December 1 of each year, the council shall prepare a written report for the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives containing a summary of activities and recommendations of the council.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2017, ch. 397, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 28, 2017).